Illinois, session 104th, HB4754.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Know Before You Owe Private Education Loan 5Act is amended by changing Sections 5 and 10 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 983/5)7    Sec. 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:8    "Annual percentage rate" means the percentage rate 9calculated according to the Federal Reserve Board's 10methodology as set forth under Regulation Z, 12 CFR Part 1026.11    "Cosigner" means any individual who is liable for the 12obligation of another without compensation, regardless of how 13the individual is designated in the contract or instrument 14with respect to that obligation, including an obligation under 15a private education loan extended to consolidate a borrower's 16preexisting student loans. The term includes any individual 17whose signature is requested, as a condition, to grant credit 18or to forbear on collection. The term does not include a spouse 19of an individual if the spouse's signature is needed solely to 20perfect the security interest in a loan. 21    "Default amount" means the loan amount of each outstanding 22loan at the time the loan is declared in default.23    "Default rate" means the default amount required to be   HB4754 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 17949 LNS 31386 b1reported during a reporting period divided by the loan amount 2of all outstanding loans required to be reported at the 3beginning of the reporting period. 4    "Educational expense" means any expense, in whole or in 5part, expressly used to finance postsecondary education, 6regardless of whether the debt incurred by a student to pay 7that expense is owed to the provider of postsecondary 8education whose school, program, or facility the student 9attends. 10    "Income share agreement" means an agreement under which a 11borrower commits to pay a percentage of his or her future 12income in exchange for money, payments, or credits applied to 13or on behalf of a borrower. An income share agreement 14constitutes a loan and debt within the meaning of this Act.15    "Income share agreement provider" means:16        (1) a person that provides money, payments, or credits 17    to or on behalf of a borrower pursuant to the terms of an 18    income share agreement; or19        (2) any other person engaged in the business of 20    soliciting, making, funding, or extending income share 21    agreements.22    "Institution of higher education" includes, but is not 23limited to, institutions falling under the Private Business 24and Vocational Schools Act of 2012, the Private College Act, 25and public institutions of higher education as defined in 26Section 1 of the Board of Higher Education Act. "Institution   HB4754 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 17949 LNS 31386 b1of higher education" also includes a person engaged in the 2business of providing postsecondary education, via 3correspondence, online, or in this State, to a person located 4in this State, regardless of whether the person has obtained 5authorization from the Illinois Board of Higher Education to 6operate in this State or is accredited.7    "Loan amount" means the total outstanding balance on each 8loan owed by a borrower to a lender at any given time. 9    "Private educational lender" and "private education loan" 10have the meanings ascribed to the terms in Section 140 of the 11Truth in Lending Act (15 U.S.C. 1650). In addition, "private 12educational lender" includes an income share agreement 13provider and a student financing company and "private 14education loan" includes an income share agreement and student 15financing.16    "Student financing company" means a person engaged in the 17business of securing, making, or extending student financing. 18"Student financing company" does not include the following 19persons, only to the extent that State regulation is preempted 20by federal law:21        (1) a federally chartered bank, savings bank, savings 22    and loan association, or credit union;23        (2) a wholly owned subsidiary of a federally chartered 24    bank or credit union; and25        (3) an operating subsidiary where each owner of the 26    operating subsidiary is wholly owned by the same federally   HB4754 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 17949 LNS 31386 b1    chartered bank or credit union.2    "Student financing" means an extension of credit that:3        (1) is not made, insured, or guaranteed under Title IV 4    of the Higher Education Act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. 1070 et 5    seq.);6        (2) is extended to a consumer expressly, in whole or 7    in part, for postsecondary educational expenses, 8    regardless of whether the extension of credit is provided 9    by the institution of higher education that the student 10    attends; 11        (3) does not include a private education loan; 12        (4) does not include an income share agreement; and13        (5) does not include a loan that is secured by real 14    property or a dwelling.15(Source: P.A. 102-583, eff. 8-26-21; 103-748, eff. 8-2-24.) 16    (110 ILCS 983/10)17    Sec. 10. Institutional certification required. 18    (a) In general. Except as provided in subsection (b) of 19this Section, before a private educational lender may disburse 20any funds with respect to a private education loan described 21in this Act, the private educational lender shall obtain from 22the relevant institution of higher education where such loan 23is to be used on the behalf of the borrower, such institution's 24certification of:25        (1) the enrollment status of the borrower;  HB4754 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 17949 LNS 31386 b1        (2) the borrower's cost of attendance at the 2    institution as determined by the institution under Title 3    IV, Part F, of the Higher Education Act of 1965 as amended; 4    and5        (3) the difference between:6            (A) such cost of attendance; and7            (B) the borrower's estimated financial assistance, 8        including such assistance received under Title IV of 9        the Higher Education Act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. 1070 et 10        seq.) and other financial assistance known to the 11        institution, as applicable.12    (b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), a private educational 13lender may disburse funds with respect to a private education 14loan described in this subsection without obtaining the 15institution's certification if the institution fails to 16provide the certification within 15 business days of the 17private educational lender's request for the certification if 18the private educational lender has received:19        (1) notification of the institution's refusal to 20    certify the request; or21        (2) notification that the institution has received the 22    request for certification and will need additional time to 23    comply with the certification request.24    (c) Loans disbursed without certification. If a private 25educational lender disburses funds without obtaining the 26certification as described in subsection (b), the private   HB4754 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 17949 LNS 31386 b1educational lender shall report the disbursement of the funds 2in a manner determined by the Student Loan Ombudsman.3    (d) Notification of loans disbursed without certification. 4On or before the date a private educational lender issues any 5funds with respect to a private education loan described in 6this Section, the private educational lender shall notify the 7relevant institution of higher education, in writing, of the 8amount of the extension of credit and the borrower on whose 9behalf credit is extended.10    (e) Annual report. A private educational lender that 11disburses funds with respect to a private education loan 12described in this Section shall prepare and submit an annual 13report to the Department of Financial and Professional 14Regulation and the Student Loan Ombudsman containing the 15required information about private education loans to be 16determined by the Student Loan Ombudsman. Such a report shall 17include, at a minimum, the following information about private 18education loans described in this Section, including any 19private education loans disbursed without certification:20        (1) (A) a list of all institutions of higher education 21    at which a private educational lender disburses funds with 22    respect to a private education loan described in this 23    Section;24        (2) (B) the total number and dollar amount volume of 25    private education loans described in this Section made 26    annually by a private educational lender;  HB4754 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 17949 LNS 31386 b1        (3) (C) the total number and dollar amount volume of 2    private education loans described in this Section made 3    annually at each school identified under paragraph (1) 4    (A);5        (4) the total number and dollar amount of private 6    education loans made annually with a cosigner; 7        (5) (D) the historical lifetime default rate for 8    borrowers obtaining a private education loan described in 9    this Section from the private educational lender; and10        (6) the default rate for the private education loans 11    reported by the private educational lender pursuant to 12    paragraph (3) for the previous reporting period under this 13    Act;14        (7) the default rate for the private education loans 15    reported by the private educational lender pursuant to 16    paragraph (4) for the previous reporting period under this 17    Act; and 18        (8) (E) a copy of each model or template promissory 19    note, agreement, contract or other instrument used by a 20    private educational lender during the previous year to 21    substantiate that a private education loan described in 22    this Section has been extended to the borrower or that a 23    borrower owes a debt to the private educational lender.24        (f) Annual report exemption. A private educational 25    lender that funds 10 or fewer new private education loans 26    in a calendar year shall be exempt from submitting the   HB4754 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 17949 LNS 31386 b1    annual report for that year. Any lender claiming this 2    exemption shall submit a statement to the Department of 3    Financial and Professional Regulation and the Student Loan 4    Ombudsman certifying the number of private education loans 5    made in that calendar year.6(Source: P.A. 102-583, eff. 8-26-21.) 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.